District of Columbia statutes.
6-914

Appeal from order of condemnation.

The owner of any building or part of a building condemned under the provisions of this act may appeal the ruling by the Superior Court of the District of Columbia under § 6-913 to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals.

History

May 1, 1906, 34 Stat. 160, ch. 2073, § 14
Aug. 28, 1954, 68 Stat. 888, ch. 1032
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 468, 32 DCR 4450
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 103(g), 48 DCR 1888

Section References

This section is referenced in § 6-907.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-714.
1973 Ed., § 5-629.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-281 rewrote the section which prior thereto read:
“The owner of any building or part of building condemned under the provisions of this chapter may, within 15 days from the date on which the owner receives notice that an order of condemnation has been reviewed by the Condemnation Review Board (‘Board’) pursuant to § 6-902 and has been affirmed and modified by the Board, appeal to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals for judicial review pursuant to § 2-510.”